Virginia statutes. Title 53.1. Prisons and Other Methods of Correction.
Article 8. Jail Industry Programs.

§ 53.1-133.1.
Definition.

As used in this article unless the context requires otherwise or it is otherwise provided, the term
“jail industry program”
means a program established by a sheriff or jail superintendent to provide employment and wage earning opportunities for persons under his custody. The program may include the production of goods and provision of services which will be marketed outside the facility.

History.

1992, c. 859; 1995, c. 756.

§ 53.1-133.2.
Establishment of jail industry programs.

The sheriff or jail superintendent operating a local correctional facility, with the approval of the local governing body, jail farm board, or regional jail or jail farm board or regional jail authority, as the case may be, is authorized to establish a jail industry program within the facility he administers or on public property or works owned, leased or operated by the county, city, town or federal government, whether the same be located within such county, city or town or elsewhere. If elsewhere, the governing body of the locality where the proposed jail industry program is to be established shall approve the location of the program. Any such program shall be subject to the provisions of this article and shall not be established, operated, maintained or otherwise supported by state funds except as provided in §

53.1-133.6

.

History.

1992, c. 859; 1995, c. 756.

§ 53.1-133.3.
Eligibility to participate.

Any person under the custody of a sheriff or jail superintendent shall be eligible to participate in the jail industry program on a voluntary basis without regard to whether that person is awaiting disposition of charges or serving a previously imposed sentence. The sheriff or jail superintendent may establish additional eligibility criteria for participation in the program.

History.

1992, c. 859; 1995, c. 756.

§ 53.1-133.4.
Participant compensation.

The sheriff or jail superintendent shall establish an amount to be allowed each jail industry program participant for each day of labor satisfactory to the sheriff or jail superintendent. The allowance shall be paid to the sheriff or jail superintendent or his designee. Distribution of a participant’s allowance shall be in the same manner as provided for distribution of wages earned in a work release program pursuant to §

53.1-131

. In addition, participants working in the jail industry program may have payroll deductions withheld and may be required by the sheriff, jail superintendent or his designee to contribute to victim restitution funds and to operating costs associated with the jail industry program. The total deductions must not total more than eighty percent of the participant’s gross wages. The amount so deducted shall be deposited in the jail industries revenue fund and the sheriff, jail superintendent or his designee shall make the appropriate distributions of the money withheld. Any balance remaining at the conclusion of the participant’s confinement shall be paid to the participant upon his release.

In addition, the sheriff or jail superintendent may establish a system of pay incentives for jail industry program participants. The system may provide for the payment of a bonus to any participant who is assigned to employment in any position of responsibility or who performs his job in an exemplary manner.

History.

1992, c. 859; 1995, c. 756.

§ 53.1-133.5.
Disposition of money collected and payment of expenses for jail industry program.

Any county, city or town that implements a jail industry program shall authorize the sheriff, jail superintendent or his designee to establish a separate fund for the operation of the program. This fund may be a special revenue fund with continuing authority to receive income and pay expenses associated with the jail industry program. The county, city, or regional jail authority shall audit the jail industry’s special revenue fund on an annual basis.

The sheriff or jail superintendent shall purchase at prices as low as reasonably possible all materials or other items used in the jail industry program as may be necessary. Invoices or itemized statements of account from each vendor of such materials and other items shall be obtained by the sheriff or jail superintendent and presented to the governing body of the county or city or, in the case of a regional jail or jail farm, the regional jail authority or, if none, that body responsible for the fiscal management of the regional jail or jail farm. The local governing body may require all such purchases to be made pursuant to local purchasing regulations.

History.

1992, c. 859; 1995, c. 756.

§ 53.1-133.6.
Restriction on sale of jail industry program goods and services; print shop.

Articles produced or manufactured and services provided by participants in jail industry programs may be disposed of by the sheriff or jail superintendent by sale only to municipal and county agencies in Virginia and to federal, state and local public agencies within or without the Commonwealth. Except as otherwise provided, no articles produced or manufactured nor services provided by prisoners may be bought, sold or acquired by exchange on the open market.

The products of any printing shop in a jail industry program shall be sold only to the departments, institutions and agencies of the Commonwealth which are supported in whole or in part with funds from the state treasury and to offices or agencies of the counties, cities and towns of the Commonwealth. Such products shall not be sold on the open market.

History.

1992, c. 859.

§ 53.1-133.7.
Sale of artistic products.

Subject to such rules as he may prescribe, the sheriff or jail superintendent may permit participants in jail industry programs to sell to the public artistic products personally crafted by the participants.
Such artistic products shall include, but are not limited to, paintings, pottery and leatherwork.

History.

1992, c. 859.

§ 53.1-133.8.
Purchases by agencies, localities, and certain nonprofit organizations.

Articles and services produced or manufactured by participants in jail industry programs:

May be purchased by all departments, institutions, and agencies of the Commonwealth that are supported in whole or in part with funds from the state treasury for their use or the use of persons whom they assist financially, provided such purchase is not in conflict with the provisions of Article 3 (§

53.1-41

et seq.) of Chapter 2.

May be purchased by any county, district of any county, city, or town and by any nonprofit, volunteer emergency medical services agencies, fire departments, sheltered workshops, and community service organizations.

History.

1992, c. 859; 2015, cc. 502, 503.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 502 and 503 are identical, and deleted “of this title” at the end of subdivision 1; substituted “emergency medical services agencies” for “lifesaving or first aid crews, rescue squads” in subdivision 2; and made minor stylistic changes.

§ 53.1-133.9.
Charges; advertisement and marketing.

The sheriff or jail superintendent, or his designee, shall establish charges for articles produced or manufactured and services provided by the jail industry program that will, in his judgment, defray the administration, operation and maintenance costs and make allowances for depreciation, return on capital and contingencies.

The sheriff or jail superintendent, or his designee, may advertise and market articles produced or manufactured and services provided by the jail industry program in a manner that will, in his judgment, allow maximum work opportunities for program participants while assuring that the program will be self-supporting, provided such advertising and marketing do not violate other provisions of law.

History.

1992, c. 859.

§ 53.1-133.10.
(See Editor’s note) Compact; transport of prisoners to and from medical facilities across state boundaries; Governor to execute.

The Governor is authorized and requested to execute, on behalf of the Commonwealth, with any other state or states legally joining therein a compact that shall be in form substantially as follows:

The compacting states solemnly agree that:

ARTICLE I.

The party states, desiring by common action to efficiently utilize and provide emergency medical, dental, and psychiatric care for prisoners of local correctional facilities, declare that it is the policy of each of the party states to cooperate with one another to serve the best interests of the prisoners and of the state and local governments in the convenient and economical provision of these services. The purpose of this compact is to provide for the mutual recognition of the control and authority over prisoners during transport to and from medical, dental, and psychiatric facilities across state boundaries.

ARTICLE II.

As used in this compact, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

“State” means a state of the United States, the United States of America, a territory or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico.

“Sending state” means a state party to this compact in which a prisoner in need of medical, dental, or psychiatric services is incarcerated.

“Receiving state” means a state party to this compact in which is located a medical, dental, or psychiatric facility.

“Prisoner” means a male or female offender who is committed under sentence to or confined in a local correctional facility.

“Local correctional facility” means any penal or correctional facility or any jail, regional jail, jail farm, or other place used for the detention or incarceration of adult offenders that is owned, maintained, or operated by any political subdivision or combination of subdivisions of a state or a local government of a state.ARTICLE III.

Each party state agrees to extend all necessary authority to law-enforcement or corrections officers from a sending state while such officers have in their custody a prisoner for the purpose of escorting the prisoner to and from a medical, dental, or psychiatric facility located in the receiving state.

ARTICLE IV.

This compact shall enter into force and become effective and binding upon the states so acting when it has been enacted into law by any two states. Thereafter, this compact shall enter into force and become effective and binding as to any other of said states upon similar action by such state.

ARTICLE V.

This compact shall continue in force and remain binding upon a party state until the party state has enacted a statute repealing the same and providing for the sending of formal written notice of withdrawal from the compact to the appropriate official of all other party states. No actual withdrawal shall take effect until one year after the notice provided in said statute has been sent. Such withdrawal shall not relieve the withdrawing state from its obligations assumed hereunder prior to the effective date of withdrawal. Before the effective date of withdrawal, a withdrawing state shall remove to its territory, at its own expense, such inmates as it may have confined pursuant to the provisions of this compact.

ARTICLE VI.

The provisions of this compact shall be liberally construed and shall be severable. If any phrase, clause, sentence, or provision of this compact is declared to be contrary to the constitution of any participating state or of the United States or the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person, or circumstance is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of this compact and the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person, or circumstance shall not be affected thereby. If this compact is held contrary to the constitution of any state participating therein, the compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining states and in full force and effect as to the state affected as to all severable matters.

History.

2013, c. 138.

Editor’s note.

The compact will take effect pursuant to Article IV of the compact.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, substituted “Compact; transport of prisoners to and from medical facilities across state boundaries; Governor to execute” for “Governor to execute; form of compact” in the section heading.